test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-attr_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Adjective - attibutes: #  
    herkki+A+Attr: herhis # HERKKI
    kuocâ+A+Attr: kuocâ # PUIGA
    puigâ+A+Attr: puigâ # PUIGA
    pyeri+A+Attr: pyeri # PYERI
    jiennii+A+Attr: jienniis # ALKKEE
    kiäđgáá+A+Attr: kiäđgáás # ALKKEE
    ivnáá+A+Attr: ivnáás # ALKKEE
    herkki+A+Attr: herhis # CEPPI
    čeppi+A+Attr: čepis # CEPPI
    jollâ+A+Attr: jolâs # CEPPI
    ucce+A+Attr: uces
    hyeni+A+Attr: hyenes # HUMO
    juurbâs+A+Attr: jurbâ # KOOIDAS
    kooidâs+A+Attr: [koidâ, koidâs] # KOOIDAS
    njäälgis+A+Attr: njaalgâ # NJAALGIS
    čielgâs+A+Attr: čielgâ # KOOIDAS
    čuuvâs+A+Attr: čuhâ # KOOIDAS
    times+A+Attr: timmâ # KOOIDAS
    fiijnes+A+Attr: [fiijnâ, fijnâ] # KOOIDAS
    keppis+A+Attr: [keppâ, keppisis] # KOOIDAS
    uces+A+Attr: uccâ # UCES
    oomâs+A+Attr: omâs # NJUORAS
    iirâs+A+Attr: irâs  # SUOTAS
    suotâs+A+Attr: [suottâsis, suotâs] # SUOTAS
    tiivrâs+A+Attr: tivrâs # SUOTAS
    kaađâš+A+Attr: kađâš # SUOTAS
    koškes+A+Attr: koške # KOSKES
    styeres+A+Attr: stuorrâ # STYERES
    väädis+A+Attr: vädis # HAAITIS
    räähis+A+Attr: rähis # HAAITIS
    uápis+A+Attr: uápis # HAAITIS
    puáris+A+Attr: puáris # HAAITIS
    kuárus+A+Attr: kuárus # HAAITIS
    ruávis+A+Attr: ruávis # RUAVIS
    kubduv+A+Attr: kubdâ # KUBDUV
    čappâd+A+Attr: čapis # FISKAD
    sevŋâd+A+Attr: sevŋis # FISKAD
    vielgâd+A+Attr: vielgis # FISKAD
    fiskâd+A+Attr: fiskis # FISKAD
    ruokkâd+A+Attr: ruokis  # 
    muččâd+A+Attr: mučis # FISKAD corp: muččâdis, mučis, no muččis
    juollâd+A+Attr: [juolis, juolâdis, juolâdâs]  # JUOLLAD
    häppil+A+Attr: häppilis # PASTIL
    olgiš+A+Attr: olgišis # PASTIL
    hämittem+A+Attr: [hämittemes, hämittes]
    huolâttem+A+Attr: [huolâttemes, huolâttes]
    
